Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.49.120

Resulting state bank—Valuation of certain assets limited.

Without approval by the director no asset shall be carried on the books of the resulting state bank at a valuation higher than that on the books of the merging or converting state or national bank at the time of its last examination by a state examiner or national bank examiner before the effective date of the merger or conversion.

[ 1994 c 92 s 149; 1955 c 33 s 30.49.120. Prior: 1953 c 234 s 12. Formerly RCW 30.49.120.]